Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska23-239
Town meeting; voters; challenges; laws applicable.

If any person offering to vote at any election, or upon any question arising at such town meeting, shall be challenged as an unqualified voter, the presiding officer shall proceed thereupon in like manner as the judges of general elections are required to do, adapting the oath to the circumstances of the town meeting, and the laws in force in regard to false swearing and illegal voting at general elections shall apply to false swearing and illegal voting at town meetings.

Laws 1895, c. 28, § 37, p. 142;

R.S.1913, § 1023;

C.S.1922, § 925;

C.S.1929, § 26-239;

R.S.1943, § 23-239.

Challenge to voter, see sections 32-926 to 32-932.

Penalties for false swearing and illegal voting, see section 32-1530.